Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-116.01
Golf car vehicle, defined.

Golf car vehicle
means a vehicle that has at least four wheels, has a maximum level ground
speed of less than twenty miles per hour, has a maximum payload capacity of
one thousand two hundred pounds, has a maximum gross vehicle weight of two
thousand five hundred pounds, has a maximum passenger capacity of not more
than four persons, and is designed and manufactured for operation on a golf
course for sporting and recreational purposes.

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 4.
January 1, 2013